Maryland, session 2026, HB1512.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–110.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “CASH” MEANS UNITED STATES COINS AND PAPER
CURRENCY.
(II) “CASH” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1512*

HOUSE BILL 1512
1. A PAPER INSTRUMENT OTHER THAN A FEDERAL
RESERVE NOTE; OR
2. A GIFT CARD.
(3) “MERCHANT” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE TRADE OR
BUSINESS OF THE SALE OF GOODS OR SERVICES.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TRANSACTION WHERE A
CUSTOMER EXPRESSLY CONSENTS TO HAVING THE TRANSACTION ROUNDED UP FOR
THE EXPRESS PURPOSE OF PROVIDING A DONATION.
(2) IN A CASH TRANSACTION BETWEEN A MERCHANT AND A
CUSTOMER FOR A GOOD OR SERVICE, IF THE MERCHANT ROUNDS UP THE TOTAL
PRICE, INCLUDING ANY APPLICABLE DISCOUNT, TAX, OR FEE, TO THE NEAREST 5
CENTS, THE MERCHANT SHALL REMIT TO THE COMPTROLLER IN THE MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE COMPTROLLER AN AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE DIFFERENCE
BETWEEN:
(I) THE PRICE THE CUSTOMER IS REQUIRED TO PAY AFTER THE
ROUNDING OCCURS; AND
(II) THE PRICE BEFORE THE ROUNDING OCCURS.
(C) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REVENUE COLLECTED
UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.